Virginia statutes. Title 24.2. Elections.
Chapter 10. Election Offenses Generally; Penalties.

§ 24.2-1000.
Intimidation of officers of election.

Any person who, by bribery, intimidation, threats, coercion, or other means in violation of the election laws willfully hinders or prevents, or attempts to hinder or prevent, the officers of election at any polling place, voter satellite office, or other location being used by a locality for voting purposes from holding an election is guilty of a Class 5 felony.

History.

Code 1950, § 24-191; 1970, c. 462, § 24.1-264; 1993, c. 641; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 528, 533.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 5 felonies, see §

18.2-10

.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 528 and 533, cl. 4 provides: “That the provisions of this act may result in a net increase in periods of imprisonment or commitment. Pursuant to § 30-19.1:4 of the Code of Virginia, the estimated amount of the necessary appropriation cannot be determined for periods of imprisonment in state adult correctional facilities; therefore, Chapter 1289 of the Acts of Assembly of 2020 requires the Virginia Criminal Sentencing Commission to assign a minimum fiscal impact of $50,000. Pursuant to § 30-19.1:4 of the Code of Virginia, the estimated amount of the necessary appropriation cannot be determined for periods of commitment to the custody of the Department of Juvenile Justice.”

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendments by Sp. Sess. I, cc. 528 and 533, effective July 1, 2021, are identical, and rewrote the section.

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Political booths. —

An absolute prohibition on political booths is not constitutionally permissible and charging a higher fee for such booths than that charged other participating individuals or organizations is presumptively unconstitutional unless justified by a compelling governmental interest, and unless it is narrowly drawn to meet that interest. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable Richard L. Morris, Member, House of Delegates, No. 14-064, 2014 Va. AG LEXIS 67 (12/18/14).

§ 24.2-1001.
Willful neglect or corrupt conduct.

If any officer of election, member of an electoral board, or other person on whom any duty is enjoined by law relative to any election, is guilty of willful neglect of his duty, he shall be guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor.

If any person listed in subsection A is guilty of any corrupt conduct in the execution of his duty, he shall be guilty of a Class 5 felony.

History.

Code 1950, § 24-212; 1970, c. 462, § 24.1-266; 1991, c. 710; 1993, c. 641.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 5 felonies, see §

18.2-10

.

As to punishment for Class 1 misdemeanors, see §

18.2-11

.

Law Review.

For essay, “The Downfall of ‘Incumbent Protection’: Case Study and Implications,” see 54 U. Rich. L. Rev. 243 (2019).

§ 24.2-1002.
Interference with registration.

Any person who, by threats or force, interferes with or attempts to interfere with (i) any registrar in the discharge of his duty, (ii) any person applying to register or declining to apply to register, or (iii) any person going to or leaving a registration location as defined in Article 3 (§

24.2-411

et seq.) of Chapter 4 of this title or a polling place, or (iv) any person going to or leaving any other location at which persons offer mail applications under Article 3.1 (§

24.2-416.1

et seq.) of Chapter 4 of this title shall be guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor.

History.

Code 1950, § 24-116; 1970, c. 462, § 24.1-265; 1984, c. 480, § 24.1-49.01; 1993, c. 641; 2003, c. 1015.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 1 misdemeanors, see §

18.2-11

.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 1015, inserted “or declining to apply to register” in clause (ii), and inserted “as defined in Article 3 (§

24.2-411

et seq.) of Chapter 4 of this title or a polling place, or (iv) any person going to or leaving any other location at which persons offer mail applications under Article 3.1 (§

24.2-416.1

et seq.) of Chapter 4 of this title.”

§ 24.2-1002.01.
Destruction of, or failure to mail or deliver, voter registration application; penalty.

If any person (i) agrees to mail or deliver a signed voter registration application to the voter registrar or other appropriate person authorized to receive the application and (ii) intentionally interferes with the applicant’s effort to register either by destroying the application or by failing to mail or deliver the application in a timely manner, he shall be guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor. The mailing or delivery of an application shall be deemed timely for the purposes of this section if it is mailed or delivered within 10 days of the applicant’s signature or in accordance with the provisions of §

24.2-416.4

for processing before the closing of the registration records for the pending election whichever comes first. This section shall not apply to any state or local government employee acting in his official capacity. If any person intentionally solicits multiple registrations from any one person or intentionally falsifies a registration application, he shall be guilty of a Class 5 felony.

History.

1997, c. 337; 2005, cc. 339, 412; 2013, c. 465.

Cross references.

As to instructions for voter registration drives, see §

24.2-416.6

. As to punishment for Class 5 felonies, see §

18.2-10

. As to punishment for Class 1 misdemeanors, see §

18.2-11

.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendments by cc. 339 and 412 are identical, and added the last sentence.

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendment by c. 465 substituted “10 days” for “15 days” in the second sentence.

§ 24.2-1002.1.
Unlawful disclosure or use of social security number or part thereof.

Any person who discloses or makes any use of the social security number, or any part thereof, of any applicant for voter registration, except as authorized by law for official use, shall be guilty of a Class 5 felony.

History.

1996, cc. 72, 73; 2007, c. 318.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 5 felonies, see §

18.2-10

.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 318 inserted “or any part thereof” following “number.”

§ 24.2-1003.
Campaigning at registration locations.

Any person who gives or tenders any campaign materials to, or solicits or attempts to influence the vote of, any person while he is at any registration location as defined in Article 3 (§

24.2-411

et seq.) of Chapter 4 of this title knowing that such person is there for the purpose of registration, shall be guilty of a Class 3 misdemeanor. Nothing in this section shall prohibit the distribution of campaign materials outside any building in which a registration activity is being conducted.

History.

1984, c. 480, § 24.1-49.01; 1993, c. 641; 2003, c. 1015.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 3 misdemeanors, see §

18.2-11

.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 1015, inserted “as defined in Article 3 (§

24.2-411

et seq.) of Chapter 4 of this title.”

§ 24.2-1004.
Illegal voting and registrations.

Any person who wrongfully deposits a ballot in the ballot container or casts a vote on any voting equipment, is guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor.

Any person who intentionally (i) votes more than once in the same election, whether those votes are cast in Virginia or in Virginia and any other state or territory of the United States, (ii) procures, assists, or induces another to vote more than once in the same election, whether those votes are cast in Virginia or in Virginia and any other state or territory of the United States, (iii) votes knowing that he is not qualified to vote where and when the vote is to be given, or (iv) procures, assists, or induces another to vote knowing that such person is not qualified to vote where and when the vote is to be given is guilty of a Class 6 felony.

Any person who intentionally (i) registers to vote at more than one residence address at the same time, whether such registrations are in Virginia or in Virginia and any other state or territory of the United States, or (ii) procures, assists, or induces another to register to vote at more than one address at the same time, whether such registrations are in Virginia or in Virginia and any other state or territory of the United States, is guilty of a Class 6 felony. This subsection shall not apply to any person who, when registering to vote, changing the address at which he is registered, transferring his registration, or assisting another in registering, changing his address, or transferring his registration, provides the information required by §

24.2-418

on the applicant’s place of last previous registration to vote.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit a covered voter, as defined in §

24.2-452

, from casting in the same election both a state ballot and a write-in absentee ballot that is processed in the manner provided by the Uniformed and Overseas Citizens Absentee Voting Act (52 U.S.C. § 20301 et seq.). If both ballots are received prior to the close of the polls on election day, the state ballot shall be counted.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 24-450, 24-451; 1970, c. 462, § 24.1-268; 1993, c. 641; 2001, c. 636; 2003, c. 1015; 2009, cc. 865, 870, 874; 2012, cc. 652, 667; 2019, cc. 668, 669; 2020, cc. 1149, 1151, 1201.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 6 felonies, see §

18.2-10

.

As to punishment for Class 1 misdemeanors, see §

18.2-11

.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2001, c. 636, cl. 2, provides: “That the provisions of this act may result in a net increase in periods of imprisonment in state correctional facilities. Pursuant to § 30-19.1:4, the estimated amount of the necessary appropriation is $0.”

Acts 2009, cc. 865, 870 and 874, cl. 3 provides: “That applications printed prior to the effective date of this act may be used until supplies are exhausted.”

At the direction of the Virginia Code Commission, “52 U.S.C. § 20301 et seq” was substituted for “42 U.S.C. § 1973ff et seq.” to conform to the editorial reclassification of Title 52, U.S.C., effective September 1, 2014.

Acts 2019, cc. 668 and 669, cl. 2, provides: “That the provisions of this act shall apply to elections beginning with the general election on November 3, 2020.” Acts 2020, c. 1201, cl. 3 repealed clause 2 of Acts 2019, cc. 668 and 669.

The 2001 amendments.

The 2001 amendment by c. 636 added the subsection A designator, and substituted “is guilty” for “shall be guilty” near the end of said subsection; and added subsections B and C.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 1015, substituted “container” for “box” in subsection A.

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendments by cc. 865, 870 and 874 are identical, and in subsection A, deleted “(i) votes knowing that he is not qualified to vote where and when the vote is to be given, (ii) procures, assists, or induces another to vote, knowing that such person is not qualified to vote where and when the vote is to be given, or (iii)” following “any person who”; and in subsection B, added clauses (iii) and (iv) and made a related change.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendments by cc. 652 and 667 are identical, and added subsection D.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendments by cc. 668 and 669 are identical, and in subsection D, substituted “subdivision A 2 of §

24.2-700

” for “subdivision 2 of §

24.2-700

.”

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendments by cc. 1149, 1151, and 1201 are identical, and substituted “covered voter, as defined in §

24.2-452

” for “person entitled to vote absentee under subdivision A 2 of §

24.2-700

” in the first sentence of subsection D.

Law Review.

For article, “Election Law,” see 35 U. Rich. L. Rev. 575 (2001).

For annual survey article, “Election Law,” see 44 U. Rich. L. Rev. 403 (2009).

For annual survey of Virginia law article, “Election Law,” see 47 U. Rich. L. Rev. 181 (2012).

§ 24.2-1005.
Intimidation of voters; civil cause of action.

Any person who intimidates, threatens, or coerces, or attempts to intimidate, threaten, or coerce, any other person in giving his vote or ballot or who intimidates, threatens, or coerces, or attempts to intimidate, threaten, or coerce a voter to deter or prevent him from voting is guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor.

In addition to the criminal penalty provided in subsection A, such actions shall also create a cause of action. A voter who is intimidated, threatened, or coerced by another person in violation of subsection A shall be entitled to institute an action for preventative relief, including an application for a permanent or temporary injunction, restraining order, or other order, against such person. The action shall be instituted in the circuit court of the locality where the violation occurred. In any such action, the court may, in its discretion, allow a private plaintiff a reasonable attorney fee as part of the costs, if such plaintiff is the prevailing party.

This section applies to any election and to any method used by a political party for selection of its nominees and for selection of delegates to its conventions and meetings.

History.

1970, c. 462, § 24.1-271; 1993, c. 641; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 528, 533.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 1 misdemeanors, see §

18.2-11

.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 528 and 533, cl. 4 provides: “That the provisions of this act may result in a net increase in periods of imprisonment or commitment. Pursuant to § 30-19.1:4 of the Code of Virginia, the estimated amount of the necessary appropriation cannot be determined for periods of imprisonment in state adult correctional facilities; therefore, Chapter 1289 of the Acts of Assembly of 2020 requires the Virginia Criminal Sentencing Commission to assign a minimum fiscal impact of $50,000. Pursuant to § 30-19.1:4 of the Code of Virginia, the estimated amount of the necessary appropriation cannot be determined for periods of commitment to the custody of the Department of Juvenile Justice.”

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendments by Sp. Sess. I, cc. 528 and 533, effective July 1, 2021, are identical, and added the subsection A designation, rewrote subsection A; and added subsection B.

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Voter intimidation. —

Where activity near polling places makes voters fear for their safety while waiting to cast their vote, or leads them to believe that they would be harmed for supporting a particular candidate, that activity may be considered intimidation of a voter, which is a criminal violation. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable Marcus B. Simon, Member, Virginia House of Delegates, 20-046,
(9/24/20).

§ 24.2-1005.1.
Communication of false information to registered voter.

It shall be unlawful for any person to communicate to a registered voter, by any means, false information, knowing the same to be false, intended to impede the voter in the exercise of his right to vote. The provisions of this section shall apply to information only about the date, time, and place of the election, or the voter’s precinct, polling place, or voter registration status, or the location of a voter satellite office or the office of the general registrar.

Any person who violates the provisions of this section is guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor.Such violation may be prosecuted either in the jurisdiction from which the communication was made or in the jurisdiction in which the communication was received.

In addition to the criminal penalty provided in subsection B, a violation of the provisions of this section shall also create a cause of action. A registered voter to whom such false information is communicated shall be entitled to institute an action for preventative relief, including an application for a permanent or temporary injunction, restraining order, or other order, against the person communicating such false information. The action shall be instituted in the circuit court of either the jurisdiction from which the communication was made or the jurisdiction in which the communication was received. In any such action, the court may, in its discretion, allow a private plaintiff a reasonable attorney fee as part of the costs, if such plaintiff is the prevailing party.

History.

2007, c. 313; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 528, 533.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 1 misdemeanor, see §

18.2-11

.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 528 and 533, cl. 4 provides: “That the provisions of this act may result in a net increase in periods of imprisonment or commitment. Pursuant to § 30-19.1:4 of the Code of Virginia, the estimated amount of the necessary appropriation cannot be determined for periods of imprisonment in state adult correctional facilities; therefore, Chapter 1289 of the Acts of Assembly of 2020 requires the Virginia Criminal Sentencing Commission to assign a minimum fiscal impact of $50,000. Pursuant to § 30-19.1:4 of the Code of Virginia, the estimated amount of the necessary appropriation cannot be determined for periods of commitment to the custody of the Department of Juvenile Justice.”

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, cc. 528 and 533, effective July 1, 2021, are identical, and added “or the location of a voter satellite office or the office of the general registrar” at the end of subsection A; in subsection B, substituted “is guilty” for “shall be guilty”; in subsection C substituted “such violation” for “A violation of this section”; and added subsection C.

§ 24.2-1005.2.
Interference with voting.

Any person acting under the color of law who, contrary to an official policy or procedure, fails to permit, or refuses to permit, a qualified voter to vote, or who willfully fails or refuses to tabulate, count, or report the vote of a qualified voter, is subject to a civil penalty in an amount not exceeding $1,000 for each affected voter. Such civil penalties shall be payable to the Voter Education and Outreach Fund established pursuant to §

24.2-131

.

Any person who furnishes a ballot to a person who he knows cannot understand the language in which the ballot is printed and misinforms him as to the content of the ballot with an intent to deceive him and induce him to vote contrary to his desire is guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor. Any person who changes a ballot of a person to prevent the person from voting as he desires is guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor. This subsection applies to any election and to any method used by a political party for selection of its nominees and for selection of delegates to its conventions and meetings.

History.

2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 528, 533.

Effective date.

This section is effective July 1, 2021, pursuant to Va. Const., Art. IV, § 13.

§ 24.2-1006.
Advice or assistance in casting ballot.

Except as provided by §

24.2-649

, no person shall directly or indirectly advise or assist any voter as to how he shall cast his ballot after the voter has entered the prohibited area at the polls as designated in §

24.2-604

.
Any person violating the provisions of this section shall be guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor.

History.

Code 1950, § 24-237; 1970, c. 462, § 24.1-267; 1993, c. 641.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 1 misdemeanors, see §

18.2-11

.

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Use of cell phones, etc. —

Use of a camera or audio or visual recording device to communicate with a person outside of the polling place for assistance in voting, is not a method of voter assistance permitted under §

24.2-649

and would constitute a violation of §

24.2-1006

. See opinion of Attorney General to Mr. William A. Bell, Jr., Secretary, Isle of Wight County Electoral Board and Mr. Robin R. Lind, Secretary, Goochland County Electoral Board, 16-038, 2016 Va. AG LEXIS 25 (9/29/16).

Voters are permitted to take photographs or pictures within the polling place, including divulging their own ballot, where doing so does not does not infringe upon another voter’s constitutional right to a secret ballot or constitute a violation of Title 24.2. See opinion of Attorney General to Mr. William A. Bell, Jr., Secretary, Isle of Wight County Electoral Board and Mr. Robin R. Lind, Secretary, Goochland County Electoral Board, 16-038, 2016 Va. AG LEXIS 25 (9/29/16).

§ 24.2-1007.
Soliciting or accepting bribe to influence or procure vote.

No person shall solicit or accept directly or indirectly any money or any thing of value to influence his or another’s vote in any election.
Any person violating the provisions of this section shall be guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor.

This section applies to any election and to any method used by a political party for selection of its nominees and for selection of delegates to its conventions and meetings.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 24-405, 24-452; 1952, c. 4; 1970, c. 462, § 24.1-272; 1976, c. 616; 1993, c. 641.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 1 misdemeanors, see §

18.2-11

.

§ 24.2-1008.
Selling, giving away, or counterfeiting ballots.

Any person who (i) wrongfully sells or gives to any person an official ballot or copy or a facsimile of or device or plate used to reproduce such ballot or (ii) counterfeits or attempts to counterfeit the official ballot or the seal used on that ballot, shall be guilty of a Class 5 felony.

History.

Code 1950, § 24-239; 1970, c. 462, § 24.1-270; 1991, c. 710; 1993, c. 641.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 5 felonies, see §

18.2-10

.

§ 24.2-1009.
Stealing or tampering with ballot containers, voting or registration equipment, software, records or documents.

Any person who (i) steals or willfully, fraudulently, or wrongfully tampers with any part of any ballot container, voting or registration equipment, records, or documents, which are used in any way within the registration or election process, (ii) steals or willfully, fraudulently, or wrongfully tampers with the software used to prepare and operate voting equipment or the software or hardware used to collect and disseminate election returns, (iii) steals or willfully, fraudulently, or wrongfully tampers with an electronic activation device or electronic data storage medium of the type used to prepare, operate or back-up electronic voting equipment, (iv) willfully, fraudulently, or wrongfully intercepts, alters or disrupts the electronic transmission of election returns or the posting of returns on the Internet, (v) fraudulently makes any entry, deletion, or alteration to any item listed in (i), or (vi) aids, abets, or permits any other person to violate the provisions of clauses (i) through (v), shall be guilty of a Class 5 felony.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 24-318, 24-404; 1952, c. 4; 1970, c. 462, §§ 24.1-273, 24.1-275; 1981, c. 425; 1991, c. 710; 1993, c. 641; 2003, c. 1015; 2004, cc. 993, 1010.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 5 felonies, see §

18.2-10

.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 1015, substituted “container” for “box” throughout the section.

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendments by cc. 993 and 1010 are identical, and rewrote the section.

§ 24.2-1010.
Unauthorized possession or duplication of voting equipment key or electronic activation device.

Any unauthorized person found in possession of any voting equipment key or electronic activation device of the type used to prepare or operate voting equipment or any unauthorized person who duplicates a voting equipment key or electronic activation device shall be guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor.

History.

Code 1950, § 24-318; 1970, c. 462, § 24.1-275; 1991, c. 710; 1993, c. 641; 2004, cc. 993, 1010.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 1 misdemeanors, see §

18.2-11

.

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendments by cc. 993 and 1010 are identical, and inserted “or electronic activation device of the type used to prepare or operate voting equipment or any unauthorized person who duplicates a voting equipment key or electronic activation device.”

§ 24.2-1011.
Ballot not to be carried away.

It shall be unlawful for any person to carry the official ballot furnished him by the officers of the election further than the voting booth, and should he, after receiving the ballot, conclude not to vote, he shall immediately return the ballot to the officers.
Any person who (i) carries an official ballot or copy thereof beyond or away from the voting booth, except to the officers of election, or (ii) votes any ballot except the ballot received from the officers of election, shall be guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor.

History.

Code 1950, § 24-236; 1970, c. 462, § 24.1-269; 1993, c. 641.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 1 misdemeanors, see §

18.2-11

.

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Use of cell phones, etc. —

Voters are permitted to take photographs or pictures within the polling place, including divulging their own ballot, where doing so does not does not infringe upon another voter’s constitutional right to a secret ballot or constitute a violation of Title 24.2. See opinion of Attorney General to Mr. William A. Bell, Jr., Secretary, Isle of Wight County Electoral Board and Mr. Robin R. Lind, Secretary, Goochland County Electoral Board, 16-038, 2016 Va. AG LEXIS 25 (9/29/16).

§ 24.2-1012.
Offenses as to absent voters.

Any person who knowingly aids or abets or attempts to aid or abet a violation of the absentee voting procedures prescribed in §

24.2-649

and Chapter 7 (§

24.2-700

et seq.) shall be guilty of a Class 5 felony.

Any person attempting to vote by fraudulently signing the name of a qualified voter shall be guilty of forgery and shall be guilty of a Class 4 felony.

Any public official who knowingly violates any of the provisions of the law concerning absent voters and thereby aids in any way the illegal casting, or attempting to cast a vote, or who connives to nullify any provisions of this chapter in order that fraud may be perpetrated, shall forever be disqualified from holding office in the Commonwealth and shall forever be disqualified from exercising the right of franchise.

History.

Code 1950, § 24-345; 1956, c. 382; 1970, c. 462, § 24.1-274; 1993, c. 641; 2006, c. 242.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 4 and 5 felonies, see §

18.2-10

.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendment by c. 242 inserted “§

24.2-649

and” in the first paragraph.

Law Review.

For 2006 survey article, “Election Law,” see 41 U. Rich. L. Rev. 121 (2006).

§ 24.2-1013.
Repealed by Acts 2006, cc. 787 and 892, cl. 2.

Cross references.

For current provisions relating to publications that are not to receive compensation for advocating candidacy, see §

24.2-955.2

.

Editor’s note.

Former §

24.2-1013

was recodified as §

24.2-955.2

.

§ 24.2-1014.
Repealed by Acts 2002, c. 487.

Editor’s note.

Former §

24.2-1014

, which required identification of persons responsible for campaign advertisements and provided for penalties, was derived from Code 1950, § 24-456; 1956, c. 398; 1970, c. 462, § 24.1-277; 1972, c. 620; 1973, c. 30; 1975, c. 515; 1976, c. 616; 1981, c. 425; 1982, c. 650; 1991, c. 709; 1993, c. 641; 1996, c. 1042; 2000, c. 539; 2001, c. 747.

§ 24.2-1014.1.
Repealed by Acts 2006, cc. 787 and 892, cl. 2.

Cross references.

For current provisions relating to identifying persons responsible for political campaign advertisements, see now Chapter 9.5 (§

24.2-955

et seq.) of Title 24.2.

Editor’s note.

Former §

24.2-1014.1

was recodified as

24.2-959

and

24.2-959.1

.

§ 24.2-1015.
Conspiracy against rights of citizens under this title.

If two or more persons conspire to injure, oppress, threaten, intimidate, prevent, or hinder any citizen of this Commonwealth in the free exercise or enjoyment of any right or privilege secured to him by the provisions of this title, or because of his having so exercised such right, they shall be guilty of a Class 5 felony.

History.

1970, c. 462, § 24.1-278; 1991, c. 710; 1993, c. 641.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 5 felonies, see §

18.2-10

.

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Voter intimidation. —

Where activity near polling places makes voters fear for their safety while waiting to cast their vote, or leads them to believe that they would be harmed for supporting a particular candidate, that activity may be considered intimidation of a voter, which is a criminal violation. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable Marcus B. Simon, Member, Virginia House of Delegates, 20-046,
(9/24/20).

§ 24.2-1016.
False statements; penalties.

Any willfully false material statement or entry made by any person in any statement, form, or report required by this title shall constitute the crime of election fraud and be punishable as a Class 5 felony.
Any preprinted statement, form, or report shall include a statement of such unlawful conduct and the penalty provided in this section.

History.

Code 1950, § 24-68; 1952, c. 341; 1958, c. 576; 1960, c. 288; 1962, c. 536; 1970, c. 462, §§ 24.1-48, 24.1-279; 1971, Ex. Sess., c. 205; 1972, c. 620; 1974, c. 428; 1975, c. 515; 1977, c. 490; 1978, c. 778; 1980, c. 639; 1989, c. 138; 1992, c. 433; 1993, c. 641.

Cross references.

As to false statements made in relation to entitlement to provisional ballots, see §

24.2-653.1

.

As to punishment for Class 5 felonies, see §

18.2-10

.

As to restoration of the civil right to vote, see §

53.1-231.2

.

Law Review.

For 2006 survey article, “Election Law,” see 41 U. Rich. L. Rev. 121 (2006).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

6B M.J. Elections, § 106; 8B M.J. Fraud and deceit, § 71.

§ 24.2-1017.
Penalties when not specifically provided elsewhere.

Any conduct made unlawful by this title, for which no punishment has been otherwise provided, shall be a Class 1 misdemeanor.

History.

Code 1950, § 24-455; 1970, c. 462, § 280; 1993, c. 641.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 1 misdemeanors, see §

18.2-11

.

§ 24.2-1018.
Immunity of witnesses.

No witness called by the court or attorney for the Commonwealth and giving evidence for the prosecution, either before a grand jury or the court in any prosecution under this title, shall ever be proceeded against for any offense made penal by the provisions of this title and committed by him at or in connection with the events germane to the matter being prosecuted; but such witness shall be compelled to testify, and for refusing to answer questions, he may be punished for contempt by the court.

History.

Code 1950, § 24-449; 1954, c. 347; 1970, c. 462, § 24.1-281; 1993, c. 641.

§ 24.2-1019.
Complaints and allegations concerning election law offenses.

Any complaint or allegation concerning unlawful conduct under this title shall be filed with the attorney for the Commonwealth of the county or city in which the alleged violation occurred. In the case of a complaint or allegation concerning the filing of a false statement in a voter registration application, the violation shall be deemed to have occurred in the county or city where the applicant sought to be registered.

History.

1983, c. 461, § 24.1-282; 1993, c. 641; 1999, c. 374.

The 1999 amendment

added the second sentence.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

6B M.J. Elections, § 106.